Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-383
Regulation by county; authorized.

All counties in Nebraska are hereby authorized and empowered by resolution to regulate the construction, installation, operation, and maintenance within their county limits and outside the limits of any incorporated city or village of all persons or entities furnishing community antenna television service. All counties, acting through their county boards, shall have power to require every individual or entity offering such service, subject to reasonable rules and regulations, to furnish any person applying therefor along the lines of its wires, cables or other conduits, with community antenna television service. The county board shall have power to prescribe reasonable quality standards for such service and to regulate and fix reasonable and compensatory rents or rates for such service including installation charges.

Laws 1971, LB 257, § 1.